Utah statutes.
20A-11-505.5.   Political party financial reporting requirements -- General requirements.

Nothing in this part requires a registered political party to report contributions and expenditures made to benefit federal candidates and filed with the Federal Election Commission.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 1997 General Session

